District of Columbia statutes.
24-1301

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Commission” means the Commission on Re-Entry and Returning Citizen Affairs established by § 24-1303(a).

(2)

“Director” means the Executive Director of the Office on Returning Citizen Affairs.

(3)

Repealed.

(4)

“Office” means the Office on Returning Citizen Affairs established by § 24-1302(a).

(5)

“Returning citizens” means persons who are residents of the District who were previously incarcerated.

Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-243, § 2, 54 DCR 605
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 3062(a), 60 DCR 12472
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 substituted “Commission on Re-Entry and Returning Citizen Affairs” for “Commission on Re-entry and Ex-Offender Affairs” in (1); substituted “Office on Returning Citizens” for “Office on Ex-Offender Affairs” in (2) and (4); repealed (3); and added (5).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3062(a) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3062(a) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 3061 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle G of Title III of the act may be cited as the “Returning Citizens Renaming Emergency Amendment Act of 2013”.

Section 5 of D.C. Law 16-243 provided that this act shall take effect subject to inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.

Section 7083 of D.C. Law 17-219 repealed section 5 of D.C. Law 16-243.

Because of the codification of D.C. Law 19-319 as subchapter II of this chapter, the preexisting text, consisting of §§ 24-1301 through 24-1304, was designated as subchapter I.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.